Florida, session 2026, SB978.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 18 19 Section 1.âSubsection (7) is added to section 1003.03, 20 Florida Statutes, to read: 21 1003.03âMaximum class size.â 22 (7)âENFORCEMENT.âThe State Board of Education shall adopt 23 rules to enforce this section and ensure the maximum number of 24 students per classroom is not exceeded. 25 Section 2.âParagraphs (b) and (c) of subsection (2) of 26 section 1006.041, Florida Statutes, are amended to read: 27 1006.041âMental health assistance program.âEach school 28 district must implement a school-based mental health assistance 29 program that includes training classroom teachers and other 30 school staff in detecting and responding to mental health issues 31 and connecting children, youth, and families who may experience 32 behavioral health issues with appropriate services. 33 (2)âA plan required under subsection (1) must be focused on 34 a multitiered system of supports to deliver evidence-based 35 mental health care assessment, diagnosis, intervention, 36 treatment, and recovery services to students with one or more 37 mental health or co-occurring substance abuse diagnoses and to 38 students at high risk of such diagnoses. Assessment procedures 39 must, at a minimum, include the use of the most recent version 40 of the Daily Living Activities-20 (DLA-20) functional assessment 41 tool, unless the department specifies in rule the use of a 42 different assessment tool. The department shall consult with the 43 Department of Children and Families before adopting rules 44 regarding use of a different assessment tool. The provision of 45 these services must be coordinated with a studentâs primary 46 mental health care provider and with other mental health 47 providers involved in the studentâs care. At a minimum, the plan 48 must include all of the following components: 49 (b)âContracts or interagency agreements with one or more 50 local community behavioral health providers or providers of 51 Community Action Team services to provide a behavioral health 52 staff presence and services at district schools, including at 53 least one licensed mental health therapist per school. Services 54 may include, but are not limited to, mental health screenings 55 and assessments, individual counseling, family counseling, group 56 counseling, psychiatric or psychological services, trauma 57 informed care, mobile crisis services, and behavior 58 modification. These behavioral health services may be provided 59 on or off the school campus and may be supplemented by 60 telehealth as defined in s. 456.47(1). 61 (c)âPolicies and procedures, including contracts with 62 service providers, which will ensure that: 63 1.âStudents referred to a school-based or community-based 64 mental health service provider for mental health screening for 65 the identification of mental health concerns and students at 66 risk for mental health disorders are assessed within 15 days 67 after referral. School-based mental health services must be 68 initiated within 15 days after identification and assessment, 69 and support by community-based mental health service providers 70 for students who are referred for community-based mental health 71 services must be initiated within 30 days after the school or 72 district makes a referral. 73 2.âParents of a student receiving services under this 74 subsection are provided information about other behavioral 75 health services available through the studentâs school or local 76 community-based behavioral health services providers. A school 77 may meet this requirement by providing information about and 78 Internet addresses for web-based directories or guides for local 79 behavioral health services. 80 3.âIndividuals living in a household with a student 81 receiving services under this subsection are provided 82 information about behavioral health services available through 83 other delivery systems or payors for which such individuals may 84 qualify, if such services appear to be needed or enhancements in 85 such individualsâ behavioral health would contribute to the 86 improved well-being of the student. 87 4.âEvery classroom has a corner designated for students to 88 regain emotional control and regulate their emotions. 89 5.âTeachers assign homework that is purposeful and in a 90 quantity that is considerate of studentsâ time outside the 91 classroom. 92 Section 3.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.